da: Højdekategorien for en loftseng: Ekstra høj højseng; Høj højseng; Lav højseng; Halvhøj seng; Andet
th: การจำแนกความสูงของเตียง Loft: ลอฟท์สูงพิเศษ; ลอฟท์สูง; ลอฟท์เตี้ย; ลอฟท์สูงปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Klasifikacija visine loft kreveta: Ekstra visoki povišeni krevet; Visoki povišeni krevet; Niski povišeni krevet; Srednje visoki povišeni krevet; Ostalo
vi: Phân loại chiều cao giường tầng: Giường gác xép siêu cao; Giường gác xép cao; Giường tầng thấp; Giường tầng trung; Khác
en: Loft bed height classification: Extra-high loft; High loft; Low loft; Mid loft; Other
pt-BR: Cama loft classificação de altura: Mezanino extralto; Mezanino alto; Cama suspensa baixa; Cama suspensa média; Outro
pt-PT: Classificação da altura da cama alta: Cama sobrelevada extra-alta; Cama sobrelevada alta; Cama alta baixa; Cama alta média; Outro
ko: 로프트 침대 높이 분류: 엑스트라 하이 로프트; 하이 로프트; 낮은 로프트; 중간 로프트; 기타
nb: Høydeklassifisering av loftseng: Ekstra høy hems; Høy hems; Lav hems; Halvhøy hems; Annet
bg-BG: Класификация на височината на високото легло (лофт легло).: Много високо легло; Високо легло; Ниско легло; Средно легло; Други
hu: Galériaágy magassági besorolása: Extra magas galériaágy; Magas galériaágy; Alacsony galériaágy; Középmagas galériaágy; Egyéb
pl: Klasyfikacja wysokości łóżka antresolowego: Bardzo wysoka antresola; Wysoka antresola; Niska antresola; Średnia antresola; Inne
zh-CN: 阁楼床高度分类: 超高架床; 高架床; 低架; 中架; 其他
sk-SK: Klasifikácia výšky poschodových postelí: Extra vysoká; Vysoká; Nízka; Stredne vysoká; Iné
sv: Loftsäng – höjdklassificering: Extra hög loftsäng; Hög loftsäng; Låg; Mellanhög; Annat
fr: Classement du lit mezzanine selon la hauteur: Mezzanine très haute; Mezzanine haute; Bas; Mi-hauteur; Autre
tr: Loft yatak yükseklik sınıflandırması: Ekstra yüksek yatak; Yüksek yatak; Alçak ranza; Orta boy ranza; Diğer
cs: Klasifikace výšky patrové postele: Extra vysoké patro; Vysoké patro; Nízké patro; Střední patro; Jiné
ja: Loftベッドの高さ分類: エクストラハイロフト; ハイロフト; ローロフト; ミドルロフト; その他
lt-LT: Paaukštintos lovos aukščio klasifikacija: Ypač aukšta; Aukšta; Žema; Vidutinio aukščio; Kita
es: Clasificación de altura de la cama alta: Cama alta extra alta; Cama alta; Cama alta baja; Cama alta media; Otro
ru: Классификация высоты кровати-чердака: Сверхвысокая кровать-чердак; Высокая кровать-чердак; Низкая; Средняя; Другое
de: Höhenklassifizierung des Hochbetts: Extra hohes Hochbett; Hohes Hochbett; Niedriges Hochbett; Mittelhohes Hochbett; Sonstige
zh-TW: 高架床高度分類: 特高挑高床; 高挑高床; 低架; 中架; 其他
sl-SI: Klasifikacija višine visoke postelje (pograda): Zelo visok pograd; Visok pograd; Nizek pograd; Srednje visok pograd; Drugo
nl: Hoogslaper hoogteclassificatie: Extra hoge hoogslaper; Hoge hoogslaper; Lage hoogslaper; Halfhoogslaper; Anders
fi: Parvisängyn korkeusluokitus: Erittäin korkea parvisänky; Korkea parvisänky; Matala parvi; Keskikorkea parvi; Muu
ro-RO: Clasificarea înălțimii patului Loft: Suspendat extra înalt; Suspendat înalt; Suspendat jos; Suspendat mediu; Altele
el: Ταξινόμηση ύψους κρεβατιού Loft: Εξαιρετικά υπερυψωμένο; Υπερυψωμένο; Χαμηλή κουκέτα; Μεσαία κουκέτα; Άλλο
it: Classificazione dell'altezza del letto a soppalco: Soppalco extra alto; Soppalco alto; Soppalco basso; Soppalco medio; Altro